Illinois, session 104th, HB563.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Fish and Aquatic Life Code is amended by 5changing Section 10-100 as follows: 6    (515 ILCS 5/10-100)  (from Ch. 56, par. 10-100)7    Sec. 10-100. Release of aquatic life. 8    (a) It shall be unlawful to release any aquatic life into 9the the wild in this State without first securing permission 10of the Department to do so, except that the owner of a body of 11water may release aquatic life indigenous to the State of 12Illinois into waters wholly upon his or her property. The 13Department shall have the authority to promulgate necessary 14rules and regulations, under the Illinois Administrative 15Procedure Act, regulating the possession, transportation, and 16shipping of aquatic life not indigenous to the State of 17Illinois. All aquatic life may be immediately returned 18unharmed from where they were taken. A violation of this 19subsection (a) is a Class B misdemeanor. 20    (b) It is unlawful to possess, transport, or release any 21live specimen or viable gametes of any species listed as 22injurious by administrative rule, unless authorized by that 23rule. A violation of this subsection (b) is a Class A   HB0563- 2 -LRB104 04425 BDA 14452 b1misdemeanor. 2(Source: P.A. 98-1044, eff. 1-1-15.)